Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1283.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Integrated Student Supports Act.Section 2. Legislative intent.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) High school dropout rates can have a significant negative impact on this Commonwealth's economy as determined by the loss of generated income tax revenue and dependence on government aid, as well as elevated risks for incarceration. (2) Graduation rates in many Pennsylvania school districts have fallen well below the Statewide average. Removing academic and nonacademic barriers to learning through evidence-based integrated student supports helps to 123456789101112131415161718 reduce dropout rates and increase graduation rates.(3) The General Assembly intends to create a fund allowing Pennsylvania public school entities to utilize programming provided by a third-party nonprofit organization in order to decrease dropout rates and increase graduation rates.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Integrated Student Supports Fund established in section 4(c)."Organization." The third-party nonprofit organization designated by the department under section 4(b)."Program." The Integrated Student Supports Program established in section 4(a)."Public school entity." Any of the following:(1) A school district as defined in section 102 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school as defined in section 1703-A of the Public School Code of 1949.(3) An intermediate unit as established under Article IX-A of the Public School Code of 1949.(4) An area career and technical school as established under Article XVIII of the Public School Code of 1949.Section 4. Integrated Student Supports Program.20250HB1283PN1454 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Establishment.--The Integrated Student Supports Program is established to remove academic and nonacademic barriers to learning as a means to enhance student academic success, decrease dropout rates and increase graduation rates in public elementary and secondary schools throughout this Commonwealth. Under the program, the department may provide grants to public school entities as provided under section 5 for students in kindergarten through grade 12.(b) Designation.--(1) Within 60 days of the effective date of this section, the Secretary of Education shall:(i) Designate, through a request for proposal process, an organization to serve as the provider of evidence-based community school services to public school entities. The organization must satisfy all of the following:(A) Currently operate in more than 60 public school entities.(B) Provide independent data collection.(C) Provide in-school and out-of-school programs in the following areas:(I) Social, emotional, physical and moral development to include mental health case management.(II) College and career preparation.(III) Behavior intervention.(IV) Parental engagement and support.(V) Student reengagement.(ii) Post notice of the designation on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.20250HB1283PN1454 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) This subsection shall be subject to the provisions of 62 Pa.C.S. (relating to procurement).(c) Fund.--The Integrated Student Supports Fund is established in the State Treasury. Money in the fund shall be used to fund the grants provided under section 5. The following shall apply to money in the fund:(1) The department may transfer undistributed money not expended, encumbered or committed from the department's appropriation to the fund for the purpose of providing grants under this section.(2) The fund may include:(i) Grants, donations, contributions or gifts from public or private sources specifically earmarked for deposit into the fund.(ii) Interest, dividends and pecuniary gains from investment of money in the fund.Section 5. Grants.(a) Establishment of advisory councils.--Each public school entity shall establish and manage an advisory council that shall develop the strategic school plan for students in kindergarten through grade 12. An advisory council shall be comprised of a diverse set of public and private stakeholders, including representatives from the public school entity, local and regional industries, private philanthropic foundations, community-based organizations and social service agencies.(b) Provision of grants.--(1) The department may provide grants to a public school entity for the purpose of funding the implementation of the approved strategic plan to provide integrated student supports to remove academic and nonacademic barriers to 20250HB1283PN1454 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 education.(2) A public school entity seeking grants under this subsection must submit a strategic plan for programming for students in kindergarten through grade 12 to the department. Grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis, based on the department's review of a public school entity's strategic plan, and shall match the public school entity's proposed investment amount in programming on a dollar-for-dollar basis. Strategic plans submitted to the department must demonstrate that a dedicated space exists or will exist within the public school entity for the use of the integrated student supports provider.(3) A grant awarded to a public school entity under this subsection shall be used in its entirety for the programming provided by the organization selected by the department.Section 6. Reports.(a) Annual report.--The organization shall provide a report on the progress of the organization's evidence-based programming within each public school entity receiving a grant under section 5 to the department within one year of the effective date of this section and annually no later than October 1 of each subsequent year thereafter. The report shall include outcomes for case-managed students, including the following:(1) Grade promotion and graduation rates.(2) Student attendance.(3) Student behavior.(4) Student academics and grade point averages.(b) Publication.--The report shall be published annually on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 7. Effective date.20250HB1283PN1454 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1283PN1454 - 6 - 1